Hawaii statutes.
PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 179D-1 to
179D-9 designated as Part I by L 2007, c 262, §2.

§179D-1 Short
title. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Hawaii
Dam and Reservoir Safety Act of 2007". [L 1987, c 199, pt of §1; am L
2007, c 262, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next